Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 9

“Uniform Principal and Income Act” and “Tennessee Uniform Prudent Investor Act of 2002” Incorporated

35-15-901. Uniform Principal and Income Act and Tennessee Uniform Prudent Investor Act of 2002 incorporated by reference.

Title 35, chapter 6 and chapter 14 are incorporated in this chapter by reference.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 76; 2013, ch. 390, § 39.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

General Comment.

According to ULC - NCCUSL, this part provides a place for a jurisdiction to enact, reenact or codify its version of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act [ULC - NCCUSL does not mention the Uniform Principal and Income Act relative to its part 9]. States adopting the Uniform Trust Code which have previously enacted the Uniform Prudent Investor Act are encouraged to reenact their version of the Prudent Investor Act in this part.

Both the Tennessee Uniform Prudent Investor Act of 2002, title 35, part 14, T.C.A. § 35-14-101 et seq., and Tennessee's version of the Uniform Principal and Income Act, title 35, part 6, T.C.A. § 35-6-101 et seq., were adopted prior to the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code. As with the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, both have been amended since their respective enactments and in certain cases, both diverge, sometimes significantly, from their respective uniform codes, as well as from various restatements. Instead of “reenacting” the Tennessee Uniform Prudent Investor Act of 2002 in part 9, the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code incorporates therein by reference such act, codified at title 35, part 14, as well as Tennessee’s version of the Uniform Principal and Income Act, codified at title 35, part 6.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.